Arkansas, session 2025, SB139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-75-101(h), concerning ancillary
agreements and existing common law standards governing covenant not to
compete agreements, is amended to read as follows:
(h)(1) This subsection section does not apply to a covenant not to
compete agreement that is ancillary to other contractual relationships,
including any type of agreement for the sale and purchase of a business,
franchise agreement, and any other agreement not ancillary to an employment
relationship or employment contract.
(2) Existing common law standards governing a covenant not to
compete agreement outside the employment background shall remain in effect.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-75-101(j), concerning the applicability
of covenant not to compete agreements, is amended to read as follows:
(j) This Except as provided under subsection (k) of this section, this
section shall not:
(1) Be read to impair, limit, or change a party's protections
*ANS095*
01/28/2025 4:56:08 PM ANS095

SB139
and rights under the Arkansas Trade Secrets Act, § 4-75-601 et seq.; or
(2) Apply to a person holding a professional license under
Arkansas Code Title 17, Subtitle 3.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-75-101, concerning covenant not to
compete agreements, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(k)(1) A covenant not to compete agreement that restricts the right of
a physician to practice within the physician's scope of practice is void.
(2) As used in subdivision (k)(1) of this section, "physician"
means a person authorized or licensed to practice medicine under the Arkansas
Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-
401 et seq., and a person authorized to practice osteopathy under § 17-91-101
et seq.






















01/28/2025 4:56:08 PM ANS095